pt-BR: Técnica de ponto cruz: Acabamento 3D/em pé; Bordado de Assis; Ponto atrás denso; Miçangas incluídas; Blackwork; Ponto cruz contado; Pontos fracionados; Cobertura total; Ponto reto longo (longstitch); Miniatura/enfeite; Monocromático; Petit point; Sampler; Ponto cruz estampado; Outro
zh-TW: 十字繡圖案技法: 3D/站立完成品; 亞西西刺繡; 密集回針繡; 包含珠子; 黑線刺繡; 數格十字繡; 分數繡; 全滿繡; 長針繡; 迷你/裝飾品; 單色; 小點繡; 樣品繡; 印花十字繡; 其他
cs: Technika vzoru křížkového stehu: 3D/stojící vyšívání; Assisi; Důraz na zadní steh; Včetně korálků; Blackwork; Počítaný křížkový steh; Zlomkové stehy; Plné pokrytí; Dlouhý steh; Miniatura/ozdoba; Monochromatické; Petit point; Vzorník; Předtištěný křížkový steh; Ostatní
sv: teknik för korsstygnsmönster: 3D/stående finish; Assisi-broderi; Mycket efterstygn; Pärlor ingår; Svartstick; Räknade korsstygn; Delade stygn; Heltäckande; Plattsöm; Mini/prydnad; Enfärgad; Petit point; Märduk; Korsstygn med påtryckt mönster; Övrigt
zh-CN: 十字绣图案绣制技法: 3D/立式成品; 阿西西刺绣; 重回针绣; 包含珠子; 黑线绣; 计数十字绣; 分数针; 全覆盖; 长针绣; 迷你/装饰品; 单色; 极小十字绣; 贴花刺绣; 印花十字绣; 其他
da: Teknik til broderimønster: 3D/stående finish; Assisi; Mange bagsting; Inkluderer perler; Sortsyning; Talt korssting; Brøkdelssting; Fuld dækning; Langsting; Mini/ornament; Monokrom; Petit point; Navneklud; Påtrykt korssting; Andet
de: Kreuzstichmustertechnik: 3D-/Aufstell-Finish; Assisi; Mit vielen Rückstichen; Mit Perlen; Schwarzstickerei; Gezählter Kreuzstich; Bruchstiche; Vollflächig; Plattstich; Mini/Ornament; Einfarbig; Petit-Point; Mustertuch; Vorgedruckter Kreuzstich; Sonstige
ru: Техника схемы вышивки крестиком: Объемное оформление (3D); Ассизи; С обилием бэкститча; Бисер в комплекте; Блэкворк; Счетный крест; Дробные крестики; Полная зашивка; Лонгститч; Миниатюра/украшение; Монохром; Петит-пойнт; Сэмплер; Печатный крест; Другое
hr-HR: Tehnika uzorka križnog boda: 3D / samostojeća završna obrada; Assisi; S puno povratnih bodova; Uključene perlice; Blackwork; Brojani križić vez; Djelomični bodovi; Potpuna pokrivenost; Longstitch; Mini/ukras; Monokromatski; Petit point; Sampler; Otisnuti križić vez; Ostalo
th: เทคนิคการปักครอสติช: 3 มิติ/แบบตั้งโชว์; Assisi; ด้นถอยหลังเป็นหลัก; รวมลูกปัด; แบล็กเวิร์ก; ครอสติชแบบนับตา; เย็บแบบครึ่งตา; เย็บเต็มผืน; ลองสติตช์; จิ๋ว/เครื่องประดับ; ขาวดำ; เพอตีตปวง; แซมเพลอร์; ครอสติชพิมพ์ลาย; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Техника за модел на кръстат бод: 3D/стоящ завършек; Асизи; С преобладаващ бод зад игла; Включени мъниста; Блекуърк; Броен кръстат бод; Дробни бодове; Пълно покритие; Дълъг бод; Мини/орнамент; Монохромен; Петит пойнт; Семплер; Щампован кръстат бод; Други
pl: Technika wzoru haftu krzyżykowego: Wykończenie 3D / stojące; Haft z Asyżu; Dużo haftu konturowego (backstitch); Koraliki w zestawie; Blackwork; Haft krzyżykowy liczony; Ściegi ułamkowe; Pełne pokrycie; Haft płaski (longstitch); Miniatura / ozdoba; Monochromatyczne; Petit point (drobny ścieg); Próbnik ściegów; Haft krzyżykowy nadrukowany; Inne
pt-PT: técnica de ponto cruz: Acabamento 3D/em pé; Assis; Muito ponto atrás; Contas incluídas; Blackwork; Ponto cruz contado; Pontos fracionários; Cobertura total; Ponto longo; Miniatura/ornamento; Monocromático; Petit point; Amostra; Ponto cruz estampado; Outro
fr: Technique de point de croix du diagramme: Finition 3D/sur pied; Assise; Point arrière dominant; Perles incluses; Blackwork; Point de croix compté; Points fractionnés; Couverture complète; Point lancé; Miniature/ornement; Monochrome; Petit point; Marquoir; Point de croix imprimé; Autre
ja: クロスステッチのパターン技法: 3D / スタンドアップ仕上げ; アッシジ; バックステッチ多用; ビーズ入り; ブラックワーク; カウントクロスステッチ; フラクショナルステッチ; フルカバレッジ; ロングステッチ; ミニ / オーナメント; モノクロ; プチポワン; サンプラー; スタンプクロスステッチ; その他
en: Cross stitch pattern technique: 3D/stand-up finish; Assisi; Backstitch-heavy; Beads included; Blackwork; Counted cross stitch; Fractional stitches; Full coverage; Longstitch; Mini/ornament; Monochrome; Petite point; Sampler; Stamped cross stitch; Other
ko: 십자수 패턴 기법: 3D/스탠드형 마감; 아시시; 백스티치 위주; 비즈 포함; 블랙워크; 카운티드 크로스 스티치; 분할 스티치; 전체 커버; 롱스티치; 미니/장식; 모노크롬; 쁘띠 포인트; 샘플러; 스탬프 크로스 스티치; 기타
nb: Teknikk for korsstingmønster: 3D / stående finish; Assisi; Mye attersting; Perler inkludert; Svartsøm; Tellet korssting; Delvise sting; Full dekning; Langsting; Mini/ornament; Ensfarget; Petit point; Navneduk; Påtrykt korssting; Annet
fi: Ristipistokuviotekniikka: 3D/pystyviimeistely; Assisi; Runsaasti tikkipistoja; Sisältää helmiä; Mustatyö; Laskettu ristipisto; Osapistot; Täysi peitto; Pitkäpisto; Mini/koriste; Yksivärinen; Pienoispisto; Mallikangas; Painettu ristipisto; Muu
nl: Kruissteekpatroon techniek: 3D/staande afwerking; Assisi; Veel stiksteken; Inclusief kralen; Blackwork; Getelde kruissteek; Gedeeltelijke steken; Volledige dekking; Platsteek; Mini/ornament; Monochroom; Petit point; Merklap; Voorbedrukte kruissteek; Overig
vi: Kỹ thuật thêu chữ thập: Hình dáng 3D/đứng; Assisi; Chủ yếu mũi đột (backstitch); Bao gồm hạt cườm; Blackwork; Thêu chữ thập đếm sợi; Mũi thêu phân số; Thêu kín bề mặt; Mũi thêu dài; Mũi thêu nhỏ/đồ trang trí; Đơn sắc; Petit point; Thêu mẫu (Sampler); Thêu chữ thập in sẵn; Khác
ro-RO: Tehnica modelului de cusătură în cruce: Finisaj 3D/de sine stătător; Assisi; Cu mult backstitch; Mărgele incluse; Blackwork; Punct în cruce numărat; Puncte fracționare; Acoperire completă; Longstitch; Miniatură/ornament; Monocrom; Petit point; Sampler; Punct în cruce imprimat; Altele
sk-SK: Technika krížikovej výšivky: 3D/stojace spracovanie; Assisi; S vysokým podielom zadného stehu; Vrátane korálikov; Blackwork; Počítaný krížikový steh; Zlomkové stehy; Plné pokrytie; Dlhý steh; Mini/ozdoba; Jednofarebné; Petit point; Vzorkovník; Predtlačený krížikový steh; Iné
el: Τεχνική μοτίβου σταυροβελονιάς: Τρισδιάστατο/Ορθοστατικό φινίρισμα; Ασίζης (Assisi); Με έμφαση στο πισωβελονάκι; Περιλαμβάνονται χάντρες; Blackwork; Μετρητή σταυροβελονιά; Κλασματικές βελονιές; Πλήρης κάλυψη; Μακρυβελονιά; Μίνι/Στολίδι; Μονόχρωμο; Petit point; Δειγματολόγιο; Σταμπωτή σταυροβελονιά; Άλλο
es: Técnica de patrón de punto de cruz: Acabado 3D/de pie; Asís; Punto atrás predominante; Con abalorios; Blackwork; Punto de cruz contado; Puntos fraccionados; Cobertura completa; Punto largo; Mini/adorno; Monocromo; Petit point; Muestrario; Punto de cruz impreso; Otro
it: tecnica del punto croce: Finitura 3D/da appoggio; Assisi; Punto indietro frequente; Perline incluse; Blackwork; Punto croce contato; Punti frazionati; Copertura totale; Punto lanciato; Miniatura/decorazione; Monocromatico; Petit point; Sampler; Punto croce stampato; Altro
tr: Kanaviçe desen tekniği: 3D/dik duran bitiş; Assisi; Yoğun geridikiş; Boncuk dahil; Siyah işi; Sayılan kanaviçe; Kesirli dikişler; Tam kapsama; Uzun dikiş; Mini/süs; Monokrom; Petite point; Sampler; Baskılı kanaviçe; Diğer
hu: Keresztöltéses minta technikája: 3D/álló kivitel; Assisi; Sok kontúröltéses; Gyöngyöket tartalmaz; Blackwork (feketehímzés); Számolt keresztszemes; Törtöltések; Teljes fedés; Hosszúöltés; Mini/dísz; Egyszínű; Petit point; Mintakendő; Nyomtatott keresztszemes; Egyéb
lt-LT: Kryžminio siuvinėjimo rašto technika: 3D / pastatomas; „Assisi“ raštas; Daug atbulinio dygsnio; Su karoliukais; „Blackwork“ raštas; Skaičiuoto kryželio raštas; Daliniai dygsniai; Visiško padengimo; Ilgojo dygsnio; Mini / ornamentas; Vienspalvis; „Petit point“ raštas; Pavyzdinis raštas; Atspausdintas kryželio raštas; Kita
sl-SI: Tehnika vzorca križnega vboda: 3D/stoječa tehnika; Asiški vbod; Prevladujoč povratni vbod; S priloženimi perlicami; Črni vez; Šteti križci; Delni vbodi; Polna pokritost; Dolgi vbod; Mini/okrasek; Enobarvno; Petit point; Vzorčnik; Potiskani križci; Drugo